Utah statutes.
40-10-5.   Activities exempted from chapter.
This chapter does not apply to the following activities:
(1)  the extraction of coal by a landowner for his own noncommercial use from
land owned or leased by him; or
(2)  the extraction of coal as an incidental part of federal, state, or local
government-financed highway or other construction under rules established by
the division.
